North Dakota, session 69, HB1528.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-21-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
12.1-21-01. Arson.
A person
1. An individual is guilty of arson, a class B felony, if hethe individual starts or maintains a fire or
causes an explosion with intent to destroy an:
a. An entire or any part of a building or inhabited structure of another or a vital public facility,
or if he starts or maintains a fire or causes an explosion with intent to destroy or;
b. Or damage histhe individual's own real or personal property for the purpose of collecting
insurance for the loss.;
c. Or damage the individual's own real property for the purpose of depriving another with a
legal interest in the real property damaged or destroyed; or
d. Or damage the individual's own personal property for the purpose of depriving another
with a legal interest in the personal property damaged or destroyed, and the value of the
personal property damaged or destroyed has a value in excess of two thousand dollars.
2. For purposes of this section, "a legal interest" includes, a joint legal interest by joint ownership
of the property, or an individual's own legal interest in property financed by another, such as a
mortgage, contract, deed, or lien.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-21-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
12.1-21-02. Endangering by fire or explosion.
1. A personAn individual is guilty of an offense if hethe individual intentionally starts or maintains
a fire or causes an explosion and thereby recklessly:
a. Places another person in danger of death or bodily injury;
b. Places an entire or any part of a building or inhabited structure of another or a vital public
facility in danger of destruction; or
c. Causes damage to property of another constituting pecuniary loss in excess of two
thousand dollars.
2. For purposes of this section, "person in danger" includes, fire department, law enforcement,
and emergency medical personnel, a firefighter, and a volunteer firefighter while responding to
a fire or during fire suppression efforts.

H. B. NO. 1528 - PAGE 2
3. The offense is a class B felony if the actor places another person in danger of death under
circumstances manifesting an extreme indifference to the value of human life. Otherwise it is a
class C felony.

H. B. NO. 1528 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1528.
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 0 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State